District of Columbia statutes.
42-2109

Proposals to develop a Technical Training Program.

(a)

The Mayor shall issue a RFP inviting organizations to submit proposals for the development and implementation of a Technical Training Program consistent with this chapter and rules promulgated pursuant to this chapter.

(b)

The Technical Training Program shall contain, at minimum, the following training elements:

(1)

Teaching individuals the legal rights and responsibilities of homeownership;

(2)

Training individuals in financial management to assist them in meeting the financial responsibilities of homeownership;

(3)

Providing individuals with technical skills that will permit them to identify and correct conditions that are unsafe or that may otherwise lead to deterioration of the property; and

(4)

Providing individuals with such other skills and information as may be required by rule.

Aug. 9, 1986, D.C. Law 6-135, § 10, 33 DCR 3771
Feb. 24, 1987, D.C. Law 6-192, § 5(g), 33 DCR 7836
Apr. 19, 2002, D.C. Law 14-114, § 801(i), 49 DCR 1468
This section is referenced in § 42-2104 and § 42-2108.
1981 Ed., § 45-2709.
D.C. Law 14-114, in subsec. (a), substituted “Mayor” for “Administrator”; and, in subsec. (b)(1), deleted “of cooperative and other forms” before “of homeownership”.